tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-ca.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see lang-ca.rme

% used: a b c d e g h i j k l n o p r s t u v w x y

\hyphenation{
cu-rie
cu-ries
gei-sha
gei-shes
goua-che
goua-ches
hip-py
hip-pies
hob-by
hob-bies
jeep
jeeps
joule
joules
klee-nex
klee-nexs
lar-ghet-ti
lar-ghet-to
lied
lieder
nos-al-tres
ro-yal-ties
ro-yal-ty
vos-al-tres
whis-ky
whis-kies}
